Illinois, session 104th, SB2915.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be referred to as the 5Judicial Sexual Assault Training Act. 6    Section 5. Education and training program.7    (a) The Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts shall 8develop and implement a sexual assault continuing education 9program for judges and relevant court personnel. The 10continuing education program shall:11        (1) be provided by professionals with substantial 12    experience in assisting survivors of sexual assault;13        (2) rely on evidence based, peer reviewed research by 14    recognized experts; and15        (3) be designed to improve the ability of the courts 16    to recognize and respond to sexual assault and abuse and 17    trauma, make appropriate decisions that prioritize the 18    safety and well-being of victims and household members, 19    and be culturally sensitive and appropriate for diverse 20    communities.21    (b) The continuing education program shall be included in 22the New Judge Seminar curriculum and be a mandatory program at 23the biennial Judicial Education Conference.  SB2915- 2 -LRB104 17516 JRC 30943 b1    (c) The Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts must 2make a record of a judge's completion of the program after the 3New Judge Seminar and the Judicial Education Conference and 4make that record available to the public upon request.